Wyoming statutes. Title 14 Children
Revision of title. —

Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1, revised this title, amending and renumbering §§

14-1-101

through

14-9-106

as §§

14-1-101

through 14-7-104. No detailed explanation of the changes made by the 1978 Act has been attempted, but, where appropriate, historical citations to former provisions have been added to corresponding sections in this title, and annotations from cases decided under former provisions have been placed under comparable sections in this title where it was felt they will be helpful. For tables of revised and renumbered sections, see Volume 11 of the Wyoming Statues Annotated.

Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 2, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this Act to the extent that such acts are in conflict herewith.”

Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 3, provides: “This act is effective January 1, 1979.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Governmental tort liability for social service agency's negligence in placement, or supervision after placement, of children, 90 ALR3d 1214.

Actions under 42 USC § 1983 for violations of Adoption Assistance and Child Welfare Act (42 USC §§ 620 et seq. and 670 et seq.), 93 ALR Fed 314.

Library References.

Family Law and Practice § 33.02 (Matthew Bender).